vi: Hình dạng gối cho bé bú: Hình chữ C; Hình chữ U; Khác
nl: Vorm verpleegkussen: C-vormig; U-vormig; Andere
sv: Form på amningskudde: C-formad; U-formad; Annat
hu: Szoptatós párna alakja: C alakú; U alakú; Egyéb
sl-SI: Oblika blazine za dojenje: V obliki črke C; V obliki črke U; Drugo
zh-CN: 哺乳枕形状: C 形; U 形; 其他
en: Nursing pillow shape: C-shaped; U-shaped; Other
da: Ammepudeform: C-formet; U-formet; Andet
th: รูปร่างหมอนรองให้นมลูก: รูปตัว C; รูปตัว U; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Formato da almofada de amamentação: Em forma de C; Em forma de U; Outro
nb: Ammeputeform: C-formet; U-formet; Annen
ja: 看護枕の形状: C型; U型; その他
de: Form des Stillkissens: C-förmig; U-förmig; Sonstiges
fr: Forme du coussin d’allaitement: En forme de C; En forme de U; Autre
it: Forma del cuscino da allattamento: A forma di C; A forma di U; Altro
el: Σχήμα μαξιλαριού θηλασμού: Σε σχήμα V; Σε σχήμα U; Άλλο
sk-SK: Tvar dojčiaceho vankúša: V tvare písmena C; V tvare písmena U; Iné
ru: Форма подушки для кормления: С-образный; U-образный; Другой
fi: Imetystyynyn muoto: C-muotoinen; U-muotoinen; Muu
hr-HR: Oblik jastuka za dojenje: U obliku slova C; U obliku slova U; Ostalo
ko: 수유 베개 모양: C자형; U자형; 기타
es: Forma del cojín de lactancia: En forma de C; En forma de U; Otros
pl: Kształt poduszki do karmienia: C-kształtny; U-kształtny; Pozostałe
tr: Emzirme Yastığı şekli: C Şekilli; U şekilli; Diğer
ro-RO: Forma pernei de alăptare: în formă de C; În formă de U; Altele
zh-TW: 哺乳枕形狀: C 型; U 型; 其他
cs: Tvar kojícího polštáře: Tvar písmene C; Tvar písmene U; Jiné
pt-PT: Forma de almofada de amamentação: Em forma de C; Em forma de U; Outro
lt-LT: Žindymo pagalvės forma: C formos; U formos; Kita
bg-BG: Форма на възглавница за кърмене: С-образна; U-образна; Други